Utah statutes.
10-8-67.   Pigsties, privies, other offensive establishments -- Prohibiting
establishment.
They may prohibit any offensive, unwholesome business or establishment in and
within one mile of the limits of the corporation, compel the owner of any
pigsty, privy, barn, corral, sewer or other unwholesome or nauseous house or
place to cleanse, abate or remove the same, and may regulate the location
thereof.
